Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.939

Director of fire protection—Adoption of minimum standard requirements for before-school and after-school programs.

The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty to adopt licensing minimum standard requirements for before-school and after-school programs in existing buildings approved by the state fire marshal.

[ 2013 c 227 s 2.]